Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 3
INDIGENT CARE

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2005. This article was amended in 2006, resulting in the relocation of provisions. For the text of this article prior to 2006, consult the 2005 Colorado Revised Statutes. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 COLORADO INDIGENT CARE PROGRAM

PART 2 COMPREHENSIVE PRIMARY AND PREVENTIVE CARE GRANT PROGRAM

PART 3 COMPREHENSIVE PRIMARY CARE SERVICES

PART 4 COLORADO DENTAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM FOR LOW-INCOME SENIORS

PART 5 HEALTH-CARE BILLING FOR INDIGENT PATIENTS RECEIVING SERVICES NOT REIMBURSED THROUGH THE COLORADO INDIGENT CARE PROGRAM